Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB479.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1321 of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1321. Methods of voter registration.An individual qualified to register to vote under section 1301(a) (relating to qualifications to register) may apply to register as follows:* * *(5) Under section 1325.1 (relating to same-day voter registration).Section 2. Title 25 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1325.1. Same-day voter registration.123456789101112131415161718 (a) Right of qualified elector.--A qualified elector may register on election day by appearing in person at the polling place for the election district in which the qualified elector maintains residence, completing and submitting a same-day voter registration application to the judge of elections and providing proof of identification and residence.(b) Acceptable forms of identification.--In addition to providing a completed same-day voter registration application, an applicant must provide a valid form of identification, which includes the following government-issued forms of identification:(1) A valid driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Transportation.(2) A valid identification card issued by another agency of the Commonwealth.(3) A valid identification card issued by the United States Government.(4) A valid United States passport.(5) A valid United States Armed Forces identification card.(c) Procedures for same-day registration.--(1) Upon certifying the eligibility of the qualified elector, the judge of elections at the polling place under subsection (a) shall issue a provisional ballot provided by the county election board, which shall be completed by the qualified elector and sealed in an envelope with the same-day voter registration application. The materials shall be sent to the department immediately.(2) Within 10 days of an election, the department shall approve or deny a same-day voter registration application.20250HB0479PN0462 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The provisional ballot may not be counted until the department has approved the voter registration application.(4) The qualified elector shall be notified in writing by the department as to the approval or denial of a voter registration application.Section 3. Section 1327(c) of Title 25 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1327. Preparation and distribution of applications.* * *(c) Distribution.--* * *(7) The secretary shall distribute to all polling places throughout this Commonwealth same-day voter registration applications and instructions to inform electors of the same-day voter registration application process and the process for counting an applicant's vote and verifying eligibility.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0479PN0462 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718